District of Columbia statutes.
4-343

Establishment of the Adoption Incentive Program; purpose.

There is established the Adoption Incentive Program (“Program”). The purpose of the Program is to provide foster parents with access to a one-time financial assistance package to assist them with the expenses associated with attorneys’ fees and the homestudy relating to the adoption of a foster child, subject to the availability of funds in the Adoption Voucher Fund.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3804, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 3804 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3802 to 3807 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).